it: Specie di selvaggina simulata: Chukar; Colomba; Oca; Gallo cedrone; Germano reale; Pernice; Fagiano; Quaglia; Coniglio; Alzavola; Altro
pt-BR: Espécie de caça simulada: Chukar; Pomba; Ganso; Tetraz; Pato-real; Perdiz; Faisão; Codorna; Coelho; Marreco; Outra
ro-RO: Specie de vânat simulată: Potârniche chukar; Porumbel; Gâscă; Potârniche de munte; Rață mare; Potârniche; Fazan; Prepeliță; Iepure; Rață mică; Alta
th: สายพันธุ์เกมจำลอง: นกกระทาชูการ์; นกเขา; ห่าน; นกไก่ฟ้ากรุส; เป็ดมัลลาร์ด; นกกระทาพาร์ทริจ; ไก่ฟ้า; นกกระทา; กระต่าย; นกเป็ดน้ำ; อื่นๆ
fi: Simuloidut riistalajit: Vuoripyy; Kyyhky; Hanhi; Metsäkanalintu; Sinisorsa; Peltopyy; Fasaani; Viiriäinen; Kani; Tavi; Muu
sk-SK: Simulované druhy zveri: Kuropta; Holub; Hus; Hlucháň; Kačica divá; Jarabica; Bažant; Prepelica; Králik; Kačica chrapkavá; Iné
fr: Espèce de gibier reproduite: Perdrix choukar; Colombe / Tourterelle; Oie; Tétras; Canard colvert; Perdrix; Faisan; Caille; Lapin; Sarcelle; Autre
tr: Taklit edilen av türü: Kınalı keklik; Kumru; Kaz; Orman tavuğu; Yeşilbaş ördek; Keklik; Sülün; Bıldırcın; Tavşan; Çamurcun; Diğer
en: Simulated game species: Chukar; Dove; Goose; Grouse; Mallard duck; Partridge; Pheasant; Quail; Rabbit; Teal; Other
el: Είδη προσομοιωμένου παιχνιδιού: Πέρδικα τσούκαρ; Περιστέρι; Χήνα; Αγριόκουρκος; Πρασινοκέφαλη πάπια; Πέρδικα; Φασιανός; Ορτύκι; Κουνέλι; Κιρκίρι; Άλλο
bg-BG: Симулирани видове дивеч: Тракийски кеклик; Гълъб; Гъска; Тетрев; Зеленоглава патица; Яребица; Фазан; Пъдпъдък; Заек; Зимно бърне; Друг
sv: Simulerade viltarter: Berghöna; Duva; Gås; Ripa; Gräsand; Rapphöna; Fasan; Vaktel; Kanin; Kricka; Övrigt
da: Simuleret vildtart: Chukarhøne; Due; Gås; Rype; Gråand; Agerhøne; Fasan; Vagtel; Kanin; Krikand; Andet
lt-LT: Imituojama medžiojamųjų gyvūnų rūšis: Keklikai; Balandžiai; Žąsys; Jerubės; Didžiosios antys; Kurapkos; Fazanai; Putpelės; Triušiai; Rudagalvės kryklės; Kita
ru: Имитируемый вид дичи: Кеклик; Голубь; Гусь; Тетерев; Кряква; Куропатка; Фазан; Перепел; Кролик; Чирок; Другое
ko: 모의 사냥감 종: 바위자고새; 비둘기; 기러기; 뇌조; 청둥오리; 자고새; 꿩; 메추라기; 토끼; 쇠오리; 기타
hr-HR: Simulirane vrste divljači: Čukar; Grlica; Guska; Tetrijeb; Divlja patka; Jarebica; Fazan; Prepelica; Zec; Kržulja; Ostalo
ja: 模擬狩猟対象種: イワシャコ; ハト; ガチョウ; ライチョウ; マガモ; ヤマウズラ; キジ; ウズラ; ウサギ; コガモ; その他
de: Simulierte Wildart: Chukarhuhn; Taube; Gans; Raufußhuhn; Stockente; Rebhuhn; Fasan; Wachtel; Kaninchen; Krickente; Andere
nb: Simulerte spillarter: Berghøne; Due; Gås; Rype; Stokkand; Rapphøne; Fasan; Vaktel; Kanin; Krikkand; Annet
pl: Symulowane gatunki łowne: Chukar; Gołąb; Gęś; Cietrzew; Krzyżówka; Kuropatwa; Bażant; Przepiórka; Królik; Cyraneczka; Inne
pt-PT: Espécie de caça simulada: Perdiz-chucar; Pomba; Ganso; Tetraz; Pato-real; Perdiz; Faisão; Codorniz; Coelho; Marrequinha; Outro
nl: Gesimuleerde wildsoort: Chukarpatrijs; Duif; Gans; Grouse; Wilde eend; Patrijs; Fazant; Kwartel; Konijn; Taling; Overig
cs: Simulované druhy zvěře: Orebice; Hrdlička; Husa; Bělokur / tetřev; Kachna divoká; Koroptev; Bažant; Křepelka; Králík; Čírka; Jiné
es: Especies de caza simuladas: Chukar; Paloma; Ganso; Urogallo; Pato real; Perdiz; Faisán; Codorniz; Conejo; Cerceta; Otro
zh-CN: 模拟猎物种类: 石鸡; 鸽子; 鹅; 松鸡; 绿头鸭; 鹧鸪; 野鸡; 鹌鹑; 兔子; 水鸭; 其他
sl-SI: Simulirane vrste divjadi: Kotorna; Golob; Gos; Jereb; Divja raca; Jerebica; Fazan; Prepelica; Zajec; Kreheljc; Drugo
zh-TW: 模擬獵物物種: 石雞; 鴿子; 鵝; 松雞; 綠頭鴨; 鷓鴣; 雉雞; 鵪鶉; 兔子; 小水鴨; 其他
hu: Szimulált vadfajok: Csukár; Galamb; Liba; Fajd; Tőkés réce; Fogoly; Fácán; Fürj; Nyúl; Csörgő réce; Egyéb
vi: Loài vật mô phỏng trong trò chơi: Gà gô Chukar; Chim bồ câu; Ngỗng; Gà gô; Vịt cổ xanh; Chim đa đa; Chim trĩ; Chim cút; Thỏ; Mòng két; Khác